District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-2304.12

Procedure for suspension or revocation of license or certificate

Repealed.

History

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 1104(h), 33 DCR 729

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., §§ 2-1704.1 to 2-1704.18.